Utah statutes.
20A-7-302.   Referendum process -- Application procedures.
(1)  Persons wishing to circulate a referendum petition shall file an
application with the lieutenant governor within five calendar days after the
end of the legislative session at which the law passed.
(2)  The application shall contain:
(a)  the name and residence address of at least five sponsors of the
referendum petition;
(b)  a certification indicating that each of the sponsors:
(i)  is a voter; and
(ii)  has voted in a regular general election in Utah within the last three
years;
(c)  the signature of each of the sponsors, attested to by a notary public;
and
(d)  a copy of the law.
